Florida, session 2026, SB2510.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.â(1)âThe Mediation and Arbitration Trust Fund 12 within the State Courts System, FLAIR number 22-2-213, is 13 terminated. 14 (2)âAll current balances remaining in, and all revenues of, 15 the trust fund shall be transferred to the State Courts Revenue 16 Trust Fund. 17 (3)âThe State Courts Revenue Trust Fund shall be used to 18 pay any outstanding debts or obligations of the terminated fund 19 as soon as practicable, and the Chief Financial Officer shall 20 close out and remove the trust fund from the various state 21 accounting and financial systems, using generally accepted 22 accounting principles concerning assets, liabilities, and 23 warrants outstanding. 24 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.